North Carolina statutes. Chapter 143C. State Budget Act.
Article 3. Development of the Governor’s Recommended Budget.

§ 143C-3-1.
Budget estimate for the legislative branch.

The Legislative Services Officer shall give the Director an estimate of the financial needs of the legislative branch for the upcoming fiscal period in accordance with the schedule prescribed by the Director. The estimates for the legislative branch shall be approved and certified by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives. The estimates shall be itemized in accordance with the accounting classifications adopted by the Controller. The Director shall include the estimates in the budget the Director submits to the General Assembly. The Director may recommend changes to these estimates in the budget submitted to the General Assembly.

History.

2006-66, s. 6.19(g); 2006-203, s. 3; 2006-221, s. 3A; 2006-259, s. 40(g).

§ 143C-3-2.
Budget estimate for the judicial branch.

The Administrative Officer of the Courts shall give the Director an estimate of the financial needs of the judicial branch for the upcoming fiscal period in accordance with the schedule prescribed by the Director. The estimates for the judiciary shall be approved and certified by the Chief Justice. The estimates shall be itemized in accordance with the accounting classifications adopted by the Controller. The Director shall include these estimates for the judicial branch in the budget the Director submits to the General Assembly. The Director may recommend changes to these estimates in the budget the Director submits to the General Assembly.

History.

2006-203, s. 3; 2007-393, s. 3.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-393, s. 3, effective October 1, 2007, inserted “for the judicial branch” in the fourth sentence, and substituted “the Director submits” for “submitted” in the last sentence.

§ 143C-3-3.
Budget requests from State agencies in the executive branch.

General Provisions. — A State agency that is not in the legislative or judicial branch of government shall submit its budget requests for the upcoming fiscal period to the Director in accordance with the schedule prescribed by the Director. The Director shall give each State agency instructions to be used in estimating the funds required to provide necessary State government programs and capital improvements. The estimates shall be itemized in accordance with the accounting classifications adopted by the Controller and shall be approved and certified by the respective head or responsible officer of the agency submitting them.

University of North Carolina System Request. — Notwithstanding the requirement in

G.S. 116-11

that the Board of Governors prepare a unified budget request for all of the constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina, budget requests of the University shall be subject to all of the following:

Repairs and renovations requests, capital fund requests, and information technology requests shall comply with subsections (c), (d), and (e) of this section.

The University of North Carolina shall not make a capital funds request proposing to construct a new facility, expand the building area (square feet) of an existing facility, or rehabilitate an existing facility to accommodate new or expanded uses unless the University has completed advanced planning through schematic design of the project with funds other than General Fund appropriations. For purposes of this subdivision, “funds other than General Fund appropriations” includes funds carried forward from one fiscal year to another pursuant to

G.S. 116-30.3

and

G.S. 116-30.3

B.Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit expenditures for planning for a project that has been authorized by an act of the General Assembly and funded with an allocation from the State Capital and Infrastructure Fund.

Repairs and Renovations Funds Request. — In addition to any other information requested by the Director, any State agency proposing to repair or renovate an existing facility shall accompany that request with all of the following:

A description of current deficiencies and proposed corrections with a review and evaluation of that proposal prepared by the Department of Administration.

An estimate of project costs approved by the Department of Administration.

A certification of project feasibility as described in

G.S. 143-341

, except that in the case of a project of The University of North Carolina for which advance planning has not been completed, the request may be submitted without this certification.

An explanation of the method by which the repair or renovation is to be financed.

Capital Funds Request. — In addition to any other information requested by the Director, any State agency proposing to (i) acquire real property, (ii) construct a new facility, (iii) expand the building area (sq. ft.) of an existing facility, or (iv) rehabilitate an existing facility to accommodate new or expanded uses shall accompany that request with all of the following:

An estimate of its space needs and other physical requirements, together with a review and evaluation of that estimate prepared by the Department of Administration, except that in the case of a project of The University of North Carolina for which advance planning has not been completed, the estimate of space needs may be a preliminary estimate.

An estimate of project costs and cash flow requirements approved by the Department of Administration.

A certification of project feasibility as described in

G.S. 143-341

, except that in the case of a project of The University of North Carolina for which advance planning has not been completed, the request may be submitted without this certification.

An explanation of the method by which the acquisition, construction, or rehabilitation is to be financed.

An estimate of maintenance and operating costs, including personnel, for the project, covering the first five years of operation.

An estimate of revenues, if any, to be derived from the project, covering the first five years of operation.This subsection does not apply to requests for State resources for railroad, highway, or bridge construction or renovation.

Information Technology Request. — In addition to any other information requested by the State Chief Information Officer (State CIO), any State agency requesting significant State resources, as defined by the State CIO, for the purpose of acquiring, operating, or maintaining information technology shall accompany that request with all of the following:

A statement of its needs for information technology and related resources, including expected improvements to programmatic or business operations, together with a review and evaluation of that statement prepared by the State Chief Information Officer.

A statement setting forth the requirements for State resources, together with an evaluation of those requirements by the State Chief Information Officer that takes into consideration the State’s current technology, the opportunities for technology sharing, the requirements of Article 15 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes, and any other factors relevant to the analysis, and in cases of an acquisition, an explanation of the method by which the acquisition is to be financed.

A statement by the State Chief Information Officer that sets forth viable alternatives, if any, for meeting the agency needs in an economical and efficient manner. A statement setting forth the requirements for State resources, together with an evaluation of those requirements, including expected improvements to programmatic or business operations by the Secretary that takes into consideration the State’s current technology, the opportunities for technology sharing, the requirements of the General Statutes, and any other factors relevant to the analysis.

In the case of an acquisition, an explanation of the method by which the acquisition is to be financed.This subsection shall not apply to requests submitted by the General Assembly or the Administrative Office of the Courts.

History.

2006-203, s. 3; 2007-117, s. 5(a); 2011-145, s. 30.12(a); 2013-360, s. 6.12(j); 2015-241, ss. 7A.4(cc), 31.9; 2015-268, s. 9.3; 2020-81, s. 4(e).

§ 143C-3-4.
Budget requests from non-State entities.

Unless otherwise provided by law, budget requests from non-State entities shall be submitted to the Director or to a State agency designated by the Director. A State agency designated to receive a budget request from a non-State entity shall evaluate the request and forward its evaluation to the Director in accordance with procedures established by the Director. This section does not apply to the General Assembly or to actions of the General Assembly to appropriate funds to non-State entities.

History.

2006-203, s. 3.

§ 143C-3-5.
Budget recommendations and budget message.

Budget Proposals. — The Governor shall present budget recommendations, consistent with

G.S. 143C-3-1

, 143C-3-2, and 143C-3-3 to each regular session of the General Assembly at a mutually agreeable time to be fixed by joint resolution.

Odd-Numbered Years. — In odd-numbered years the budget recommendations shall include the following components:

A Recommended State Budget setting forth goals for improving the State with recommended expenditure requirements, funding sources, and performance information for each State government program and for each proposed capital improvement. The Recommended State Budget may be presented in a format chosen by the Director, except that the Recommended State Budget shall clearly distinguish program base budget requirements, program reductions, program eliminations, changes in program fund sources, program expansions, and new programs, and shall explain all proposed capital improvements in the context of the Six-Year Capital Improvements Plan and as required by

G.S. 143C-8-6

.

(1a)

The Governor’s Recommended State Budget shall include a base budget, which shall be presented pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection.

A Recommended Base Budget showing, for each budget code and purpose or program in State government, accounting detail corresponding to the Recommended State Budget.

The Recommended Base Budget shall employ the North Carolina Accounting System Uniform Chart of Accounts adopted by the State Controller to show both uses and sources of funds and shall display in separate parallel columns all of the following: (i) actual expenditures and receipts for the most recent fiscal year for which actual information is available, (ii) the certified budget for the preceding fiscal year, (iii) the currently authorized budget for the preceding fiscal year, (iv) program base budget requirements for each fiscal year of the biennium, (v) proposed expenditures and receipts for each fiscal year of the biennium, and (vi) proposed increases and decreases.

The Recommended Base Budget shall include detailed information on recommended expenditures for capital improvements as required by

G.S. 143C-8-6

.

The Recommended Base Budget shall include accurate projections of receipts, expenditures, and fund balances. Estimated receipts, including tuition collected by university or community college institutions, shall be adjusted to reflect actual collections from the previous fiscal year, unless the Director recommends a change that will result in collections in the budget year that differ from prior year actuals, or the Director otherwise determines there is a more reasonable basis upon which to accurately project receipts. If receipts are projected to decrease, the corresponding expenditure shall be decreased in a like amount. Revenue and expenditure detail provided in the Budget Support Document shall be no less detailed than the two-digit level in the North Carolina Accounting System Uniform Chart of Accounts as prescribed by the State Controller.

The Recommended Base Budget shall clearly identify all proposed expenditures supported by existing or proposed appropriations, including statutory appropriations.

A recommended Current Operations Appropriations Act that makes appropriations for each fiscal year of the upcoming biennium for the operating and capital expenses of all State agencies as contained in the Recommended State Budget.

The biennial State Information Technology Plan as outlined in Part 2 of Article 15 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes to be consistent in facilitating the goals outlined in the Recommended State Budget.

A list of budget adjustments made during the prior fiscal year pursuant to

G.S. 143C-6-4

that are included in the proposed base budget for the upcoming fiscal year. The list of budget adjustments shall identify the revision number, revision type, revision title, the purpose or programs affected, and the amount of funds moving between the purpose or programs.

The Governor’s Recommended State Budget shall include a transfer to the Savings Reserve of fifteen percent (15%) of the estimated growth in State tax revenues that are deposited in the General Fund for each fiscal year of the upcoming biennium. This subdivision applies only if, and to the extent that, the balance of the Savings Reserve remains below the recommended Savings Reserve balance developed pursuant to G.S. 143C-4-2(f).

The Governor’s Recommended State Budget shall include a transfer to the State Capital and Infrastructure Fund of four percent (4%) of the estimated net State tax revenues that are deposited in the General Fund for each fiscal year of the upcoming biennium.

Even-Numbered Years. — In even-numbered years, the Governor may recommend changes in the enacted budget for the second year of the biennium. These recommendations shall be presented as amendments to the enacted budget and shall be incorporated in a recommended Current Operations Appropriations Act. Any recommended changes shall clearly distinguish program reductions, program eliminations, changes in program fund sources, program expansions, and new programs, and shall explain all proposed capital improvements in the context of the Six-Year Capital Improvements Plan and as required by

G.S. 143C-8-6

. The Governor shall provide sufficient supporting documentation and accounting detail, consistent with that required by subsection (b) of this section, corresponding to the recommended amendments to the enacted budget.

Funds Included in Budget. — Consistent with requirements of the North Carolina Constitution, Article 5, Section 7(1), the Governor’s Recommended State Budget, together with the Recommended Base Budget and Recommended Capital Improvements Budget Support Document, shall include recommended expenditures of State funds from all Governmental and Proprietary Funds, as those funds are described in

G.S. 143C-1-3

, and all funds established for The University of North Carolina and its constituent institutions that are subject to this Chapter. Except where provided otherwise by federal law, funds received from the federal government become State funds when deposited in the State treasury and shall be classified and accounted for in the Governor’s budget recommendations no differently than funds from other sources.

Availability Estimates. — The recommended Current Operations Appropriations Act shall contain a statement showing the estimates of General Fund availability, Highway Fund availability, and Highway Trust Fund availability upon which the Recommended State Budget is based.

Budget Message. — The Governor’s budget recommendations shall be accompanied by a written budget message that does all of the following:

Explains the goals embodied in the recommended budget.

Explains important features of the activities anticipated in the budget.

Explains the assumptions underlying the statement of revenue availability.

Sets forth the reasons for changes from the previous biennium or fiscal year, as appropriate, in terms of programs, program goals, appropriation levels, and revenue yields.

Identifies anticipated sources of funding for major spending initiatives.

Prepares a fiscal analysis that addresses the State’s budget outlook for the upcoming five-year period. This fiscal analysis shall include detailed estimates for five years for any proposals to create new or significantly expand programs and for proposals to create new or change existing law.

Different Gubernatorial Administrations. — For years in which there will be a change in gubernatorial administrations, the incumbent Governor shall complete the budget recommendations and budget message by December 15 and deliver them to the Governor-elect.

History.

2006-203, s. 3; 2007-393, s. 4; 2012-194, s. 34; 2013-360, s. 6.12(e), (k); 2014-100, s. 6.4(c); 2015-241, s. 7A.4(dd); 2017-5, s. 2; 2017-57, ss. 6.6(c), 36.12(d); 2019-250, s. 5.9(b); 2021-180, s. 5.5(b).